Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4032.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [62A.156] REIMBURSEMENT FOR ANESTHESIA. new text end new text begin A health carrier organized as a for-profit entity is prohibited from establishing a lower reimbursement rate for anesthesia services based solely on a provider's license type or title if performing the service is within the provider's scope of practice under Minnesota law. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, and applies to health plans offered, issued, or renewed on or after that date. new text end